fr: Type de système de montage de l’octoban: Support de sol inclus; Multi-clamp inclus; Aucun support inclus; Monté sur rack; Monté sur support (pince); Support de suspension; Support/attache de tom; Autre
es: Tipo de sistema de montaje del octoban: Soporte de piso incluido; Multitabrazadera incluida; Sin soporte incluido; Montado en rack; Montado en soporte (abrazadera); Montaje de suspensión; Montaje/soporte de tom; Otro
zh-CN: 八角盒安装系统类型: 包含落地支架; 包含多用途夹具; 不含安装座; 机架安装; 支架安装（夹具）; 悬浮安装; 嗵鼓安装座/支架; 其他
vi: Loại hệ thống lắp đặt Octoban: Kèm chân đế đặt sàn; Kèm đa kẹp; Không kèm ngàm gắn; Gắn trên giá; Gắn trên chân đế (kẹp); Ngàm treo; Ngàm gắn/giá đỡ trống tom; Khác
da: Monteringssystem for octoban: Gulvstativ medfølger; Multiklampe medfølger; Intet beslag medfølger; Rackmonteret; Stativmonteret (klampe); Ophængsbeslag; Tom-beslag/bracket; Andet
nb: Type Octoban-monteringssystem: Gulvstativ inkludert; Multiklemme inkludert; Feste ikke inkludert; Rackmontert; Stativmontert (klemme); Opphengfeste; Tom-feste/brakett; Annet
el: Σύστημα στήριξης τύπου Octoban: Περιλαμβάνεται βάση δαπέδου; Περιλαμβάνεται πολλαπλός σφιγκτήρας; Δεν περιλαμβάνεται βάση; Τοποθέτηση σε ικρίωμα (rack); Τοποθέτηση σε βάση (με σφιγκτήρα); Βάση ανάρτησης; Βάση/στήριγμα για τομ; Άλλο
sk-SK: Typ upevňovacieho systému oktobanu: Vrátane stojana na podlahu; Vrátane multi-svorky; Bez montážneho systému; Montáž na rampu; Montáž na stojan (svorka); Závesná montáž; Držiak/montáž na prechod; Iný
sl-SI: Vrsta sistema montaže oktabana: Vključeno talno stojalo; Vključena večnamenska sponka; Brez nastavka; Montaža na kletko; Pritrjeno na stojalo (sponka); Viseči nastavek; Nastavek/nosilec za tom; Drugo
nl: Octoban montagesysteemtype: Inclusief vloerstandaard; Inclusief multiklem; Geen houder inbegrepen; In rack gemonteerd; Op standaard gemonteerd (klem); Ophangsysteem; Tomhouder/-klem; Overig
de: Typ des Octoban-Montagesystems: Inklusive Bodenständer; Inklusive Multiklammer; Ohne Halterung; Rack-Montage; Ständermontage (Klammer); Freischwingende Halterung; Tom-Halterung/-Klammer; Andere
sv: Monteringssystemtyp för octoban: Golvstativ ingår; Multiklämma ingår; Inget fäste ingår; Rackmonterad; Stativmonterad (klämma); Upphängningsfäste; Pukfäste; Övrigt
it: Tipo di sistema di montaggio dell'octoban: Supporto da terra incluso; Morsetto multiplo incluso; Nessun supporto incluso; Montaggio a rack; Montaggio su supporto (morsetto); Supporto a sospensione; Supporto per tom/staffa; Altro
en: Octoban mounting system type: Floor stand included; Multi-clamp included; No mount included; Rack-mounted; Stand-mounted (clamp); Suspension mount; Tom mount/bracket; Other
hu: Octoban rögzítési rendszer típusa: Padlóállvánnyal; Multibilinccsel; Rögzítő nélkül; Karámra szerelhető; Állványra szerelhető (bilincs); Felfüggesztett rögzítés; Tamtartó / konzol; Egyéb
fi: Octobanin ripustusjärjestelmän tyyppi: Lattiateline sisältyy; Moniklamppi sisältyy; Teline ei sisälly; Räkkiin asennettava; Jalustaan asennettava (klamppi); Kelluva kiinnitys; Tomikiinnike/-pidike; Muu
lt-LT: Octoban montavimo sistemos tipas: Su grindiniu stovu; Su universaliu spaustuku; Be tvirtinimo elemento; Tvirtinama prie rėmo; Tvirtinama prie stovo (spaustuku); Pakabinamas laikiklis; Tomo laikiklis / gembė; Kita
bg-BG: Тип монтажна система за октобан: Включена подова стойка; Включена мулти-скоба; Не е включена стойка; За монтаж на рак; За монтаж на стойка (скоба); Окачване; Стойка/скоба за том; Друго
zh-TW: Octoban 安裝系統類型: 包含落地支架; 包含多功能夾具; 不含安裝底座; 機架安裝; 支架安裝 (夾具); 懸吊式安裝; 中鼓安裝座/支架; 其他
ru: Тип системы крепления октобанов: Стойка в комплекте; Мультиклэмп в комплекте; Без крепления в комплекте; Крепление на раму; Крепление на стойку (клэмп); Подвесное крепление; Крепление для тома / кронштейн; Другое
pt-BR: Octoban sistema de montagem tipo: Suporte de chão incluído; Grampo múltiplo incluído; Sem suporte incluído; Montagem em rack; Montagem em suporte (grampo); Montagem suspensa; Suporte/braçadeira de tom; Outro
tr: Octoban montaj sistemi tipi: Zemin standı dahil; Çoklu kelepçe dahil; Montaj aparatı dahil değil; Rafa monte; Standa monte (kelepçe); Askılı montaj; Tom montajı/braketi; Diğer
pt-PT: Sistema de montagem tipo Octoban: Suporte de chão incluído; Abraçadeira múltipla incluída; Sem suporte incluído; Montagem em rack; Montagem em suporte (abraçadeira); Montagem de suspensão; Montagem/braçadeira de timbalão; Outro
ko: 옥토반 장착 시스템 유형: 플로어 스탠드 포함; 멀티 클램프 포함; 마운트 미포함; 랙 장착형; 스탠드 장착형(클램프); 서스펜션 마운트; 탐 마운트/브래킷; 기타
cs: Typ montážního systému Octoban: Včetně podlahového stojanu; Včetně multi-clamp svorky; Bez montážního systému; Montáž na rampu; Montáž na stojan (svorka); Závěsný systém; Tom držák / konzola; Ostatní
ja: オクトバンマウントシステムタイプ: フロアスタンド付属; マルチクランプ付属; マウントなし; ラックマウント; スタンドマウント (クランプ); サスペンションマウント; タムマウント/ブラケット; その他
hr-HR: Vrsta sustava za montažu Octoban: Uključen podni stalak; Uključena višenamjenska stezaljka; Nosač nije uključen; Montira se na stalak; Montira se na stalak (stezaljka); Viseći nosač; Nosač/konzola za tom; Ostalo
th: ระบบการติดตั้งแบบอ็อกโทบัน: มีขาตั้งพื้นรวมอยู่ด้วย; มีมัลติแคลมป์รวมอยู่ด้วย; ไม่มีเมาท์รวมอยู่ด้วย; ยึดกับแร็ค; ยึดกับขาตั้ง (แคลมป์); เมาท์แบบแขวน; เมาท์/โครงยึดกลองทอม; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul sistemului de montare Octoban: Suport de podea inclus; Clemă multiplă inclusă; Fără suport inclus; Montat pe rack; Montat pe suport (clemă); Montură cu suspensie; Montură/Suport pentru tom; Altele
pl: Typ systemu montażu octobanu: Statyw podłogowy w zestawie; Multiclamp w zestawie; Brak mocowania w zestawie; Mocowany do ramy; Mocowany do statywu (klamra); Mocowanie zawieszenia; Mocowanie/uchwyt do tomów; Inny